Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.191

Form of contribution.

The contribution of a member to a limited liability company may consist of tangible or intangible property or other benefits to the limited liability company, including money, services performed, promissory notes, other agreements to contribute cash or property, or contracts for services to be performed.

[ 2015 c 188 s 39.]